Alaska, session 34, HB43.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 06 * Section 1. AS 15.05.010 is amended to read: 07 Sec. 15.05.010. Voter qualification. A person may vote at any election who 08 (1) is a citizen of the United States; 09 (2) is 18 years of age or older; 10 (3) has been a resident of the state and of the house district in which 11 the person seeks to vote for at least 30 days just before the election; and 12 (4) has registered [BEFORE THE ELECTION] as required under 13 AS 15.07 and is not registered to vote in another jurisdiction. 14 * Sec. 2. AS 15.05.020 is amended to read: 01 Sec. 15.05.020. Rules for determining residence of voter. For the purpose of 02 determining residence for voting, the place of residence is governed by the following 03 rules: 04 (1) A person may not be considered to have gained a residence solely 05 by reason of presence nor may a person lose it solely by reason of absence while in the 06 civil or military service of this state or of the United States or of absence because of 07 marriage to a person engaged in the civil or military service of this state or the United 08 States, while a student at an institution of learning, while in an institution or asylum at 09 public expense, while confined in public prison, while engaged in the navigation of 10 waters of this state or the United States or of the high seas, while residing on [UPON] 11 an Indian or military reservation, or while residing in the Alaska Pioneers' Home or 12 the Alaska Veterans' Home. 13 (2) The residence of a person is that place in which the person's 14 physical habitation is fixed, and to which, whenever absent, the person has an 15 articulable and reasonable plan [THE INTENTION] to return. If a person resides in 16 one place, but does business in another, the former is the person's place of residence. 17 Temporary work sites do not constitute a dwelling place. 18 (3) [A CHANGE OF RESIDENCE IS MADE ONLY BY THE ACT 19 OF REMOVAL JOINED WITH THE INTENT TO REMAIN IN ANOTHER 20 PLACE.] There can only be one residence. 21 (4) A person does not lose residence if the person leaves home and 22 goes to another country, state, or place in this state for temporary purposes only and 23 with the intent of returning to the person's residence. 24 (5) A person does not gain residence in any place to which the person 25 comes without the present intention to establish a permanent dwelling at that place. 26 (6) A person loses residence in this state if the person establishes 27 residence in another state or votes in another state's election, either in person or by 28 absentee ballot, and will not be eligible to vote in this state until again qualifying 29 under AS 15.05.010. 30 (7) The term of residence is computed by including the day on which 31 the person's residence begins and excluding the day of election. 01 (8) The address of a voter as it appears on the official voter registration 02 record is presumptive evidence of the person's voting residence. This presumption is 03 negated [ONLY] if the voter notifies the director in writing of a change of voting 04 residence. When a voter's qualification is questioned under AS 15.15.210 or 05 challenged in accordance with the procedure adopted in regulation under 06 AS 15.20.215, the presumption may be rebutted by providing evidence to the 07 division that the voter has established residence in another state or place in this 08 state or evidence that the voter is not a resident under (2) - (7) of this section. 09 * Sec. 3. AS 15.07.060 is amended by adding new subsections to read: 10 (g) The division shall provide an applicant the opportunity to designate, from 11 among the written languages in which the division is required to print election 12 materials under 52 U.S.C. 10503, as amended, the language in which the applicant 13 prefers to receive ballots and other election materials printed for an election. The 14 division shall provide the applicant with ballots and election materials in the 15 applicant's designated language unless the applicant designates a language in which 16 the division is not required to print ballots and election materials. The division shall 17 notify an applicant when ballots and election materials printed in the designated 18 language are not available and allow the applicant another opportunity to designate a 19 language under this subsection. The division shall provide an applicant with ballots 20 and election materials in the designated language until the earlier of the date that 21 (1) the applicant's voter registration is inactivated or cancelled; or 22 (2) the division is no longer required under 52 U.S.C. 10503, as 23 amended, to print ballots and election materials in the designated language. 24 (h) An applicant who requests registration within 30 days before an election 25 shall supply a declaration stating whether the applicant established residency at least 26 30 days before the date of the election in 27 (1) the state; 28 (2) the house district in which the applicant seeks to vote at the 29 election. 30 * Sec. 4. AS 15.07.070(b) is amended to read: 31 (b) To register by mail or by facsimile, scanning, or other electronic 01 transmission approved by the director under AS 15.07.050, the director, the area 02 election supervisor, or a voter registration agency shall furnish, at no cost to the voter, 03 forms prepared by the director on which the registration information required under 04 AS 15.07.060 shall be inserted by the voter, by a person on behalf of the voter if that 05 person is designated to act on behalf of the voter in a power of attorney, or by a person 06 on behalf of the voter if the voter is physically incapacitated. The director shall 07 accept the electronic signature of the voter or a person acting on behalf of the 08 voter. The director may require proof of identification of the applicant as required by 09 regulations adopted by the director under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act). 10 Upon receipt and approval of the completed registration forms, the director or the 11 election supervisor shall forward to the voter an acknowledgment, and the voter's 12 name shall immediately be placed on the master register. If the registration is denied, 13 the voter shall immediately be informed in writing that registration was denied and the 14 reason for denial. When identifying information has been provided by the voter as 15 required by this chapter, the election supervisor shall forward to the voter a 16 registration card. 17 * Sec. 5. AS 15.07.070(c) is amended to read: 18 (c) The names of persons submitting completed registration forms by mail that 19 are postmarked at least 30 days before the next election, or submitting completed 20 registration forms by facsimile or other electronic transmission approved by the 21 director under AS 15.07.050 that are received at least 30 days before the next election, 22 shall be placed on the official registration list for that election. If a registration form 23 received by mail less than 30 days before an election does not have a legible and dated 24 postmark, the name of the person submitting the form shall be placed on the official 25 registration list for that election if the form was signed and dated by the person at least 26 30 days before the election and if the form is received by the director or election 27 supervisor at least 25 days before the election. The name of a person submitting a 28 completed registration form by mail or by facsimile or other electronic transmission 29 that does not meet the applicable requirements of this subsection may not be placed on 30 the official registration list for that election but shall be placed on the master register 31 after that election. A person submitting a completed registration form that does 01 not meet the requirements of this subsection for placement on the master register 02 for the next election but who complies with AS 15.07.060(h) may vote an absentee 03 in-person, special needs, or questioned ballot at that election. 04 * Sec. 6. AS 15.07.070(d) is amended to read: 05 (d) Qualified voters may register in person before a registration official or 06 through a voter registration agency at any time throughout the year. A qualified voter 07 who registers [, EXCEPT THAT A PERSON REGISTERING] within 30 days before 08 or on the day of an election may vote only an absentee in-person, special needs, or 09 questioned ballot [PRECEDING AN ELECTION IS NOT ELIGIBLE TO VOTE] at 10 that election. The division may not reject the absentee in-person, special needs, or 11 questioned ballot of a qualified voter who registers within 30 days before or on 12 the day of an election on the grounds that the voter is not on the official 13 registration list for the election. Upon receipt and approval of the registration forms, 14 the director or the election supervisor shall forward to the voter an acknowledgment in 15 the form of a registration card, and the voter's name shall immediately be placed on 16 the master register. Names of persons registering 30 or more days before an election 17 shall be placed on the official registration list for that election. 18 * Sec. 7. AS 15.07.070(h) is amended to read: 19 (h) The director shall design the form of the voter's certificate appearing on 20 the envelope that is used for voting an absentee in-person, special needs, or 21 questioned ballot so that all information required for registration by AS 15.07.060(a) 22 may be obtained from a voter who votes an absentee in-person, special needs, or 23 questioned ballot. The form must include the instruction that a person registering 24 to vote using the voter's certificate who wishes to declare the person's affiliation 25 should complete the affiliation section on the certificate. If the voter voting an 26 absentee in-person, special needs, or questioned ballot has completed all information 27 on the voter registration portion of the absentee in-person, special needs, or 28 questioned ballot voter's certificate, the director shall place the name of the voter on 29 the official registration list. 30 * Sec. 8. AS 15.07.090(b) is amended to read: 31 (b) A voter shall reregister if the voter's registration is cancelled as provided in 01 AS 15.07.130. A person reregistering under this subsection may vote only an 02 absentee in-person, special needs, or questioned ballot until [THE 03 REREGISTRATION IS EFFECTIVE FOR] the next election that occurs at least 30 04 days after the date of reregistration. The division may not reject the absentee in- 05 person, special needs, or questioned ballot of a qualified voter who reregisters 06 within 30 days before or on the day of an election on the grounds that the voter is 07 not on the official registration list for the election. 08 * Sec. 9. AS 15.07.090(c) is amended to read: 09 (c) The director shall transfer the registration of a voter from one precinct to 10 another within a house district when requested by the voter. If a [THE] request is 11 [SHALL BE] made within 30 [OR MORE] days before [THE] election day or on 12 election day, a person transferring registration to a new precinct may vote only 13 an absentee in-person, special needs, or questioned ballot. The division may not 14 reject the absentee in-person, special needs, or questioned ballot of a qualified 15 voter who transfers registration within 30 days before or on the day of an election 16 on the grounds that the voter is not on the official registration list for the election. 17 The director shall transfer the registration of a voter from one house district to another 18 when requested by the voter. The voter must reside in the new house district for at 19 least 30 days in order to vote a ballot for that district. 20 * Sec. 10. AS 15.07.090(d) is amended to read: 21 (d) A person who claims to be a registered voter, but for whom no evidence of 22 registration in the precinct can be found, may vote only an absentee in-person, 23 special needs, or questioned ballot. The division may not reject the absentee in- 24 person, special needs, or questioned ballot of a qualified voter who registers 25 within 30 days before or on the day of an election on the grounds that the voter is 26 not on the official registration list for the election [SHALL BE GRANTED THE 27 RIGHT TO VOTE IN THE SAME MANNER AS THAT OF A QUESTIONED 28 VOTER AND THE BALLOT SHALL BE TREATED IN THE SAME MANNER. 29 THE BALLOT SHALL BE CONSIDERED TO BE A "QUESTIONED BALLOT" 30 AND SHALL BE SO DESIGNATED. THE DIRECTOR OR THE DIRECTOR'S 31 REPRESENTATIVE SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER THE VOTER IS 01 REGISTERED IN THE HOUSE DISTRICT BEFORE COUNTING THE BALLOT. 02 A VOTER WHO HAS FAILED TO OBTAIN A TRANSFER AS PROVIDED IN (c) 03 OF THIS SECTION SHALL VOTE A "QUESTIONED BALLOT" IN THE 04 PRECINCT IN WHICH THE VOTER RESIDES]. 05 * Sec. 11. AS 15.07.130(a) is amended to read: 06 (a) Periodically, at times of the director's choosing, but not [NO] less 07 frequently than in January of each calendar year, the director shall examine the master 08 register maintained under AS 15.07.120 and shall send, by forwardable 09 [NONFORWARDABLE] mail to the voter's registration mailing address, and to the 10 voter's electronic mail address, if available, a notice requesting address 11 confirmation or correction. The notice must explain that the voter's registration 12 will be inactivated unless the voter responds to the notice within 45 days after the 13 date the notice is sent. The director shall send the notice to each voter 14 (1) whose mail from the division has been returned to the division in 15 the two years immediately preceding the examination of the register; 16 (2) who has not contacted the division in the two years immediately 17 preceding the examination of the register and [; OR (3)] who has not voted or 18 appeared to vote in the two general elections immediately preceding the examination 19 of the register; or 20 (3) who the division has learned, after registering to vote in this 21 state and during the period encompassing the two general elections immediately 22 preceding the examination of the register, has 23 (A) registered to vote in another state; 24 (B) received a driver's license from another state; 25 (C) registered a vehicle in another state; 26 (D) received public assistance from another state; 27 (E) served on a jury in another state; 28 (F) obtained a resident hunting or fishing license in another 29 state; 30 (G) paid the state resident tuition rate for a public 31 university in another state; 01 (H) received a homestead or residential property tax 02 exemption in another state; or 03 (I) received a benefit available only to residents of another 04 state. 05 * Sec. 12. AS 15.07.130(e) is amended to read: 06 (e) For purposes of (b) and (d) of this section, a voter "appears to vote" if 07 (1) the voter is present at a polling place or at an early [ABSENTEE] 08 voting station designated under AS 15.20.045(b) at a time when the polling place or 09 early [ABSENTEE] voting station is operating, for the purpose of casting a vote; 10 (2) the voter applies to the division to obtain an absentee ballot; or 11 (3) in an election conducted by mail under AS 15.20.800, a voter who 12 has not received a ballot by mail makes a timely request to the division for a ballot. 13 * Sec. 13. AS 15.07 is amended by adding a new section to read: 14 Sec. 15.07.133. Process to cancel registration. The director shall develop a 15 process to allow a voter to cancel the voter's registration electronically or in person 16 before an election official. The director shall prominently display instructions for a 17 voter to cancel the voter's registration at each polling place. 18 * Sec. 14. AS 15.10.105 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 19 (c) The director shall employ five rural community liaisons and assign each 20 liaison to a region of the state in a manner that ensures each part of the state has one 21 rural community liaison. The rural community liaisons shall collaborate with tribes, 22 municipalities, corporations incorporated under AS 10.06, regional nonprofit 23 corporations, and other community organizations to facilitate access to early and 24 absentee voting in rural areas of the state and ensure that precincts in rural areas of the 25 state are fully staffed. 26 * Sec. 15. AS 15.13.020(j) is amended to read: 27 (j) The commission shall establish offices [AN OFFICE, WHICH MAY BE 28 CALLED A REGIONAL OFFICE, IN EACH SENATE DISTRICT IN THE STATE 29 TO KEEP ON FILE FOR PUBLIC INSPECTION COPIES OF ALL REPORTS 30 FILED WITH THE COMMISSION BY CANDIDATES FOR STATEWIDE OFFICE 31 AND BY CANDIDATES FOR LEGISLATIVE OFFICE IN THAT DISTRICT; 01 HOWEVER, WHERE ONE MUNICIPALITY CONTAINS MORE THAN ONE 02 HOUSE DISTRICT, ONLY ONE COMMISSION OFFICE SHALL BE 03 ESTABLISHED IN THAT MUNICIPALITY. THE REGIONAL OFFICE SHALL 04 MAKE ALL FORMS AND PERTINENT MATERIAL AVAILABLE TO 05 CANDIDATES. ALL REPORTS SHALL BE FILED BY CANDIDATES, GROUPS, 06 AND INDIVIDUALS DIRECTLY WITH THE COMMISSION'S CENTRAL 07 DISTRICT OFFICE. THE COMMISSION SHALL ENSURE THAT COPIES OF 08 ALL REPORTS BY STATEWIDE AND LEGISLATIVE CANDIDATES IN EACH 09 SENATE DISTRICT ARE FORWARDED PROMPTLY TO THAT DISTRICT OR 10 REGIONAL OFFICE]. 11 * Sec. 16. AS 15.15.060(a) is amended to read: 12 (a) Immediately following the appointment of the election board, the election 13 supervisor in conjunction with the election board chair shall secure polling places for 14 holding the election, suitable ballot boxes that will ensure [ASSURE] security, and an 15 adequate number of voting booths or screens, national flags, pens, and pencils. At 16 every polling place, at least one voting booth shall be furnished and not less than one 17 voting booth or screen shall be furnished for each 100 votes or fractional part of 100 18 votes cast in the previous election. [AT EVERY POLLING PLACE, AT LEAST 19 ONE-HALF OF THE VOTING BOOTHS USED SHALL BE NOT LESS THAN SIX 20 FEET IN HEIGHT, ENCLOSED ON THREE SIDES, AND PROVIDED WITH A 21 CURTAIN EXTENDING FROM THE TOP OF THE VOTING BOOTH TO 22 WITHIN APPROXIMATELY 30 INCHES OF THE FLOOR. THE CURTAIN OF 23 THE VOTING BOOTH MUST CONCEAL THE VOTER WHILE VOTING.] The 24 election supervisor and the election board chair may, in an emergency, secure an 25 alternate location for a polling place. 26 * Sec. 17. AS 15.15.060(b) is amended to read: 27 (b) To ensure [ASSURE] administrative economy and to protect the secrecy 28 of the ballot, the director may adopt regulations prescribing 29 (1) the type of polling place for holding the election; 30 (2) the requirements regarding ballot boxes, voting screens, national 31 flags, and other supplies; and 01 (3) [SUBJECT TO THE SPECIFICATIONS OF (a) OF THIS 02 SECTION,] the requirements regarding voting booths. 03 * Sec. 18. AS 15.15.060 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 04 (f) At each polling place, the division shall provide language assistance as 05 required under 52 U.S.C. 10503, as amended. An election supervisor shall post at each 06 polling place information regarding the availability of language assistance in English 07 and all other languages for which language assistance is required to be provided in the 08 jurisdiction under federal law. 09 * Sec. 19. AS 15.15 is amended by adding a new section to read: 10 Sec. 15.15.205. Questioning of voter who requested absentee ballot. If a 11 voter appears on the official registration list as having received or voted an absentee 12 ballot, the election official shall affirmatively advise the voter that the voter may 13 surrender the absentee ballot for destruction or cast a questioned ballot. If the voter 14 does not surrender the absentee ballot, the voter shall be allowed to vote a questioned 15 ballot. 16 * Sec. 20. AS 15.15.370 is amended to read: 17 Sec. 15.15.370. Results [COMPLETION] of ballot count [; 18 CERTIFICATE]. When the count of ballots is completed, and in no event later than 19 the day after the election, the election board shall make a certificate in duplicate of the 20 results. The certificate includes the number of votes cast for each candidate, including, 21 for a candidate in a general election, the number of votes at each ranking performed 22 [ROUND OF THE RANKED-CHOICE TABULATION PROCESS] under 23 AS 15.15.350, the number of votes for and against each proposition, yes or no on each 24 question, and any additional information prescribed by the director. The election board 25 shall, immediately upon completion of the certificate or as soon thereafter as the local 26 mail service permits, send in one sealed package to the director one copy of the 27 certificate and the register. In addition, all ballots properly cast shall be mailed to the 28 director in a separate, sealed package. Both packages, in addition to an address on the 29 outside, shall clearly indicate the precinct from which they come. Each board shall, 30 immediately upon completion of the certification and as soon thereafter as the local 31 mail service permits, send the duplicate certificate to the respective election 01 supervisor. The director may authorize election boards in precincts in those areas of 02 the state where distance and weather make mail communication unreliable to forward 03 their election results by telephone or radio. The director may authorize the unofficial 04 totaling of votes on a regional basis by election supervisors, tallying the votes as 05 indicated on duplicate certificates. If the director publishes unofficial results, the 06 director shall include, for each candidate, the subsequent candidate rankings 07 selected by the voters who ranked that candidate as the voters' first choice. To 08 ensure adequate protection, the director shall prescribe the manner in which the 09 ballots, registers, and all other election records and materials are thereafter preserved, 10 transferred, and destroyed. 11 * Sec. 21. AS 15.15.370 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 12 (b) Each day that the director releases unofficial totals of election results for a 13 general election, the director shall also release an updated ranked-choice tabulation 14 and identify the precincts that have been counted. 15 * Sec. 22. AS 15.15.380 is amended to read: 16 Sec. 15.15.380. Payment of election board members. The director shall pay 17 each election board member for time spent at election duties, including the receiving 18 of instructions. Election board chairpersons and the chairperson and members of the 19 absentee ballot, questioned ballot, and state ballot counting review boards shall be 20 paid for time spent at their election duties. The director shall set the compensation to 21 be paid under this section. The director may reduce the compensation to be paid 22 under this section only by regulation. 23 * Sec. 23. AS 15.15.420 is amended to read: 24 Sec. 15.15.420. Duty to review the ballot counting. The director shall review 25 the counting of the ballots under [WITH] the observance [ASSISTANCE] of and in 26 the presence of the appointed representatives from the political parties. A candidate 27 for an office that is on the ballots being counted and appointed representatives 28 from the group supporting and from the group opposing a ballot proposition may 29 be present and observe. 30 * Sec. 24. AS 15.15.430(a) is amended to read: 31 (a) The review of ballot counting by the director must [SHALL] include 01 [ONLY (1)] a review of the precinct registers, tallies, and ballots cast. The review 02 must include [; (2)] a review of absentee and questioned ballots as prescribed by law. 03 The review must include, for each house district except a house district where all 04 races on the ballot are uncontested [; AND (3) UNLESS THE BALLOT FOR THE 05 HOUSE DISTRICT CONTAINS NOTHING BUT UNCONTESTED OFFICES], a 06 hand count of ballots from one randomly selected precinct in the [EACH] house 07 district that accounts for at least five percent of the ballots cast in that district. The 08 director may adopt regulations prescribing additional review procedures 09 employing statistical methods to limit the risk of certifying an election result that 10 would be inconsistent with the result that would be obtained by conducting a 11 recount. 12 * Sec. 25. AS 15.20.030 is amended to read: 13 Sec. 15.20.030. Preparation of ballots, envelopes, and other material. The 14 director shall provide ballots for use as absentee ballots in all districts. The director 15 shall provide a secrecy sleeve in which the voter shall initially place the marked ballot, 16 and shall provide a postage-paid return [AN] envelope with the prescribed voter's 17 certificate on it, in which the secrecy sleeve with ballot enclosed shall be placed. The 18 director shall prescribe the form of and prepare the voter's certificate, envelopes, and 19 other material used in absentee voting. The voter's certificate shall include a 20 declaration, for use when required, that the voter is a qualified voter in all respects, a 21 blank for the voter's signature, and a space for recording the date that the voter 22 signed the certificate. An envelope may not identify a voter's party affiliation [, A 23 CERTIFICATION THAT THE AFFIANT PROPERLY EXECUTED THE 24 MARKING OF THE BALLOT AND GAVE THE VOTER'S IDENTITY, BLANKS 25 FOR THE ATTESTING OFFICIAL OR WITNESS, AND A PLACE FOR 26 RECORDING THE DATE THE ENVELOPE WAS SEALED AND WITNESSED]. 27 The envelope with the voter's certificate must include a notice that false statements 28 made by the voter [OR BY THE ATTESTING OFFICIAL OR WITNESS] on the 29 certificate are punishable by law. 30 * Sec. 26. AS 15.20.045 is amended to read: 31 Sec. 15.20.045. Designation of absentee voting officials and stations. (a) 01 The director or election supervisor may designate persons to act as absentee voting 02 officials under AS 15.20.010 - 15.20.220 in areas where election supervisors do not 03 have offices. Magistrates may, with the approval of the administrative director of the 04 Alaska Court System, be designated under this section. At least 30 [15] days before 05 the election the director shall supply each absentee voting official with appropriate 06 ballots. 07 (b) The director may designate by regulation [ADOPTED UNDER AS 44.62 08 (ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE ACT)] locations at which early [ABSENTEE] 09 voting stations will be operated for persons to vote absentee ballots on or after the 10 30th [15TH] day before an election up to and including the date of the election. The 11 director shall supply these [ABSENTEE] voting stations with absentee ballots for all 12 house districts in the state and shall designate absentee voting officials to serve at the 13 [ABSENTEE] voting stations. 14 (c) In a municipality in which the division will not be operating an early 15 [ABSENTEE] voting station under this section, the director may designate the 16 municipal clerk as an absentee voting official for the limited purpose of distributing 17 absentee ballots to qualified voters under AS 15.20.061(a)(1) and qualified voters' 18 representatives under AS 15.20.072. At least 30 [15] days before the election, the 19 director shall supply municipal clerks designated under this subsection with absentee 20 ballots. 21 * Sec. 27. AS 15.20.050 is amended to read: 22 Sec. 15.20.050. Requirement of full public notice. The director shall give full 23 public notice of the dates and manner of voting absentee and may select any means of 24 communication permitted to be used in giving notice of the date and time of the 25 general election. The director shall give notice under this section of the location of 26 early [ABSENTEE] voting stations designated under AS 15.20.045(b) at least 45 27 days before each election. 28 * Sec. 28. AS 15.20.061(a) is amended to read: 29 (a) A qualified voter may apply in person for an absentee ballot to the 30 following election officials at the times specified: 31 (1) to an absentee voting official on or after the 20th [15TH] day 01 before an election up to and including the date of the election; 02 (2) to an election supervisor on or after the 20th [15TH] day before an 03 election up to and including the date of the election; 04 (3) to an absentee voting official at an early [ABSENTEE] voting 05 station designated under AS 15.20.045(b) on or after the 20th [15TH] day before an 06 election up to and including the date of the election; 07 (4) to an absentee voting official in the precinct in which no volunteers 08 can be located to serve on the election board on or after the 20th [15TH] day before an 09 election up to and including election day. 10 * Sec. 29. AS 15.20.064(a) is amended to read: 11 (a) For 20 [15] days before an election and on election day, a qualified voter 12 who meets the requirements set out in this section may vote in locations designated by 13 the director. 14 * Sec. 30. AS 15.20.064 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 15 (e) If a voter fails to satisfy the requirements of (b) of this section, the voter 16 shall be allowed to vote an absentee ballot in the manner provided in AS 15.20.061. 17 * Sec. 31. AS 15.20.072(b) is amended to read: 18 (b) The voter may, through a representative, request a special needs ballot 19 from the following election officials at the times specified: 20 (1) from an absentee voting official on or after the 30th [15TH] day 21 before an election, up to and including election day; 22 (2) from an election supervisor on or after the 30th [15TH] day before 23 an election up to and including election day; 24 (3) from an absentee voting official at an early [ABSENTEE] voting 25 station designated under AS 15.20.045(b) on or after the 30th [15TH] day before an 26 election up to and including the date of the election; or 27 (4) from a member of the precinct election board on election day. 28 * Sec. 32. AS 15.20.072 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 29 (h) If a voter satisfies the requirements of (d) of this section, the division may 30 not reject a voter's special needs ballot based on an error by an election official or 31 representative on the register under (c) of this section or an error by a representative 01 under (d) of this section. 02 * Sec. 33. AS 15.20.081(d) is amended to read: 03 (d) Upon receipt of an absentee ballot by mail, the voter [, IN THE 04 PRESENCE OF A NOTARY PUBLIC, COMMISSIONED OFFICER OF THE 05 ARMED FORCES INCLUDING THE NATIONAL GUARD, DISTRICT JUDGE 06 OR MAGISTRATE, UNITED STATES POSTAL OFFICIAL, REGISTRATION 07 OFFICIAL, OR OTHER PERSON QUALIFIED TO ADMINISTER OATHS,] may 08 proceed to mark the ballot in secret, to place the ballot in the secrecy sleeve, to place 09 the secrecy sleeve in the envelope provided, and to sign the voter's certificate on the 10 envelope. The [IN THE PRESENCE OF AN OFFICIAL LISTED IN THIS 11 SUBSECTION WHO SHALL SIGN AS ATTESTING OFFICIAL AND SHALL 12 DATE THE SIGNATURE. IF NONE OF THE OFFICIALS LISTED IN THIS 13 SUBSECTION IS REASONABLY ACCESSIBLE, AN ABSENTEE VOTER 14 SHALL SIGN THE VOTER'S CERTIFICATE IN THE PRESENCE OF AN 15 INDIVIDUAL WHO IS 18 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER, WHO SHALL SIGN AS 16 A WITNESS AND ATTEST TO THE DATE ON WHICH THE VOTER SIGNED 17 THE CERTIFICATE IN THE INDIVIDUAL'S PRESENCE, AND, IN ADDITION, 18 THE] voter shall certify, as prescribed in AS 09.63.020, under penalty of perjury, that 19 the statements in the voter's certification are true. 20 * Sec. 34. AS 15.20.081(e) is amended to read: 21 (e) An absentee ballot must be marked on or before the date of the election. 22 Except as provided in (h) of this section, a voter who returns the absentee ballot by 23 mail, whether provided to the voter by mail or by electronic transmission, shall use a 24 mail service at least equal to first class and mail the ballot not later than the day of the 25 election to the election supervisor for the house district in which the voter seeks to 26 vote. Except as provided in AS 15.20.480, the ballot may not be counted unless it is 27 received by the close of business on the 10th day after the election. [IF THE BALLOT 28 IS POSTMARKED, IT MUST BE POSTMARKED ON OR BEFORE ELECTION 29 DAY.] After the day of the election, ballots may not be accepted unless received by 30 mail. A ballot received after the day of the election that is not postmarked or is 31 postmarked after the day of the election may not be counted unless the ballot 01 envelope is marked with a United States Postal Service tracking barcode 02 sufficient to verify that the ballot was mailed on or before the day of the election 03 or with a division of elections ballot tracking barcode sufficient to verify that the 04 ballot was mailed on or before the day of the election. 05 * Sec. 35. AS 15.20.081 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 06 (m) If a voter requests under AS 15.07.060(g) or, at least 45 days before an 07 election, requests in writing or by other means designated in regulations adopted by 08 the director to receive a ballot in a language other than English in which the division is 09 required to print election materials under 52 U.S.C. 10503, as amended, the director 10 shall provide the voter with a ballot and election materials under this section in the 11 language requested. 12 * Sec. 36. AS 15.20.201(a) is amended to read: 13 (a) Not [NO] less than 10 [SEVEN] days preceding the day of election, the 14 election supervisor, in the presence and with the assistance of the district absentee 15 ballot counting board, shall begin to review all voter certificates and envelopes of 16 absentee ballots received by that date. The review of absentee ballots shall continue at 17 times designated by the election supervisor until completed. An absentee ballot may 18 not be counted until the accompanying voter certificate has been reviewed. 19 * Sec. 37. AS 15.20.201(b) is amended to read: 20 (b) Counting of absentee ballots that have been reviewed shall begin not less 21 than 10 days preceding [AT 8:00 P.M., LOCAL TIME, ON] the day of the election 22 at places designated by each election supervisor and shall continue until all absentee 23 ballots reviewed and eligible for counting have been counted. The counting teams 24 shall report the first count of absentee ballots to the district absentee ballot counting 25 board not later than [. AN ELECTION SUPERVISOR OR AN ELECTION 26 OFFICIAL MAY NOT COUNT ABSENTEE BALLOTS BEFORE] 8:00 p.m., local 27 time, on the day of the election. Counting of the absentee ballots shall continue at 28 times designated by the election supervisor until all absentee ballots are counted. 29 * Sec. 38. AS 15.20.203(b) is amended to read: 30 (b) The board shall reject an [AN] absentee ballot [MAY NOT BE 31 COUNTED] if 01 (1) the voter has failed to properly sign [EXECUTE] the certificate; 02 (2) [AN OFFICIAL OR THE WITNESSES AUTHORIZED BY LAW 03 TO ATTEST THE VOTER'S CERTIFICATE FAIL TO EXECUTE THE 04 CERTIFICATE, EXCEPT THAT AN ABSENTEE BALLOT CAST IN PERSON 05 AND ACCEPTED BY AN ABSENTEE VOTING OFFICIAL OR ELECTION 06 SUPERVISOR MAY BE COUNTED DESPITE FAILURE OF THE ABSENTEE 07 VOTING OFFICIAL OR ELECTION SUPERVISOR TO PROPERLY SIGN AND 08 DATE THE VOTER'S CERTIFICATE AS ATTESTING OFFICIAL AS REQUIRED 09 UNDER AS 15.20.061(c); 10 (3) THE BALLOT IS NOT ATTESTED ON OR BEFORE THE 11 DATE OF THE ELECTION; 12 (4)] the ballot envelope and certificate, if delivered by mail after the 13 day of the election [POSTMARKED], 14 (A) is [NOT] postmarked after [ON OR BEFORE] the date of 15 the election; or 16 (B) has a United States Postal Service tracking barcode or a 17 division of elections ballot tracking barcode verifying that the ballot was 18 mailed after the date of the election; 19 (3) [(5)] after the day of election, the ballot was delivered by a means 20 other than mail; or 21 (4) [OR (6)] the voter voted 22 (A) in person and is a 23 (i) first-time voter who initially registered by mail or by 24 facsimile or other electronic transmission approved by the director 25 under AS 15.07.050, has not provided the identification required by 26 AS 15.15.225(a), was not eligible for waiver of the identification 27 requirement under AS 15.15.225(b), and has not provided the 28 identifiers required in AS 15.07.060(a)(2) and (3) that can be verified 29 through state agency records described in AS 15.07.055(e); or 30 (ii) voter other than one described in (i) of this 31 subparagraph, did not provide identification described in 01 AS 15.15.225(a), was not personally known by the election official, 02 and has not provided the identifiers required in AS 15.07.060(a)(2) and 03 (3); or 04 (B) by mail or electronic transmission, is a first-time voter who 05 initially registered by mail or by facsimile or other electronic transmission 06 approved by the director under AS 15.07.050 to vote, has not met the 07 identification requirements set out in AS 15.07.060, and does not submit with 08 the ballot a copy of a 09 (i) driver's license, state identification card, current and 10 valid photo identification, birth certificate, passport, or hunting or 11 fishing license; or 12 (ii) current utility bill, bank statement, paycheck, 13 government check, or other government document; an item described 14 in this sub-subparagraph must show the name and current address of 15 the voter. 16 * Sec. 39. AS 15.20.220(b) is amended to read: 17 (b) The state review board shall review and count absentee ballots under 18 AS 15.20.081(e) and (h), absentee ballots properly cured under AS 15.20.222, and 19 questioned ballots that have been forwarded to the director and that have not been 20 reviewed or counted by a district counting board. 21 * Sec. 40. AS 15.20 is amended by adding a new section to read: 22 Sec. 15.20.222. Procedure for curing uncounted ballot. (a) If a voter returns 23 a ballot that is rejected because the certificate is missing a signature or the voter 24 provided insufficient voter identification, the director shall immediately make a 25 reasonable effort to contact the voter, explain the ballot deficiency, explain how the 26 deficiency may be cured, and inform the voter of the deadline to cure the ballot. The 27 director shall, within 24 hours, attempt to begin sending notices of deficiency by 28 electronic mail to the voter's electronic mail address if the voter has provided an 29 electronic mail address. If the voter has provided a telephone number, the director 30 shall, within 24 hours, attempt to notify the voter of the deficiency by telephone call 31 and text message. The director shall, within 48 hours and not later than five days after 01 election day, send a notice of deficiency by first class, nonforwardable mail to the 02 address on the voter's registration record. 03 (b) A notice of deficiency must include a form for the voter to confirm that the 04 voter returned a ballot to the division and provide a copy of a form of identification 05 accepted by the division under AS 15.15.225(a). The director shall provide a printed 06 copy of the form with the notice of deficiency mailed to the voter. The director shall 07 also make the form available in a format that can be completed and returned 08 electronically. 09 (c) The rejected ballot of a voter who received a notice of deficiency may be 10 counted only if 11 (1) the voter returns the form sent with the notice of deficiency, the 12 division receives the form within 14 days after election day, and the form confirms 13 that the voter returned a ballot to the division; 14 (2) the voter provides a signature and includes a copy of a form of 15 identification accepted by the division under AS 15.15.225(a); and 16 (3) the ballot is otherwise valid. 17 (d) The director shall, if applicable, send copies of the signature on the voter's 18 return envelope and the signature stored in voter registration records to the attorney 19 general for investigation if the voter returns the form and the form indicates that the 20 voter did not return a ballot to the division. 21 * Sec. 41. AS 15.56.030(d) is amended to read: 22 (d) For purposes of (a)(2) and (3) of this section, "other valuable thing" 23 (1) includes 24 (A) an entry in a game of chance in which a prize of money or 25 other present or future pecuniary gain or advantage may be awarded to a 26 participant wherein the total of the prizes offered is greater than $2 per 27 participant with a maximum of $100; and 28 (B) government employment or benefits; 29 (2) does not include 30 (A) materials having a nominal value bearing the name, 31 likeness, or other identification of a candidate, political party, political group, 01 party district committee, or organization, or stating a position on a ballot 02 proposition or question; 03 (B) food and refreshments provided incidental to an activity 04 that is nonpartisan in nature and directed at encouraging persons to vote, or 05 incidental to a gathering in support of or in opposition to a candidate, political 06 party, political group, party district committee, organization, or ballot question 07 or proposition; 08 (C) care of the voter's dependents provided in connection with 09 the absence of a voter from home for the purpose of voting; 10 (D) services provided by a person acting as a representative 11 under AS 15.20.072; 12 (E) services provided by an election official as defined in 13 AS 15.80.010; [AND] 14 (F) transportation of a voter to or from the polls without 15 charge; and 16 (G) postage-paid return envelopes required in 17 AS 15.20.030. 18 * Sec. 42. AS 15.58.030(h) is amended to read: 19 (h) The lieutenant governor shall prepare and publish on the division's Internet 20 website the photograph and statement of a candidate for an office designated under 21 (a), (b), or (g) of this section. The lieutenant governor shall indicate that the 22 photograph and statement are provided and paid for by the candidate. A photograph 23 and a statement of a candidate that have been timely filed with the lieutenant governor 24 shall be published on the website at least 30 [15] days before an election at which the 25 candidate will appear on the ballot. 26 * Sec. 43. AS 15.80 is amended by adding a new section to read: 27 Sec. 15.80.006. Cybersecurity. The director shall, by regulation, develop a 28 cybersecurity program to defend the voter registration records kept by the division 29 against cyber attacks and data breaches and enable the division to detect and recover 30 from cyber attacks. The program must include cybersecurity training for election 31 officials. 01 * Sec. 44. AS 19.25.105(a) is amended to read: 02 (a) Outdoor advertising may not be erected or maintained within 660 feet of 03 the nearest edge of the right-of-way and visible from the main-traveled way of the 04 interstate, primary, or secondary highways in this state except the following: 05 (1) directional and other official signs and notices that [WHICH] 06 include [, BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO,] signs and notices pertaining to natural 07 wonders, scenic and historic attractions, which are required or authorized by law, and 08 which shall conform to federal standards for interstate and primary systems; 09 (2) signs, displays, and devices advertising the sale or lease of property 10 on [UPON] which they are located or advertising activities conducted on the property; 11 (3) signs determined by the state, subject to concurrence of the United 12 States Department of Transportation, to be landmark signs, including signs on farm 13 structures or natural surfaces of historic or artistic significance, the preservation of 14 which would be consistent with the provisions of this chapter; 15 (4) directional signs and notices pertaining to schools; 16 (5) advertising on bus benches or bus shelters, and adjacent trash 17 receptacles, if the state determines that the advertising conforms to local, state, and 18 federal standards for interstate and primary highways; 19 (6) temporary political campaign signs not larger than 32 square 20 feet in size displayed on private property if the owner or resident of the property 21 is not being compensated for the display, the sign is not a risk to the public, and 22 the sign is outside of an interstate, primary, or secondary highway right-of-way. 23 * Sec. 45. AS 24.45.091 is amended to read: 24 Sec. 24.45.091. Publication of reports. Copies of the statements and reports 25 filed under this chapter shall be made available to the public at the commission's 26 offices [CENTRAL OFFICE], the office of the lieutenant governor, and the legislative 27 reference library of the Legislative Affairs Agency [, AND AT THE COMMISSION'S 28 DISTRICT OFFICES PRESCRIBED IN AS 15.13.020(j)] as soon as practicable after 29 each reporting period. 30 * Sec. 46. AS 29.20.380(c) is amended to read: 31 (c) The municipal clerk may act as an absentee voting official under 01 AS 15.20.045(c) for the limited purpose of distributing absentee ballots to qualified 02 voters or qualified voters' representatives under AS 15.20.072 in a municipality in 03 which the division of elections will not be operating an early [ABSENTEE] voting 04 station under AS 15.20.045(b). 05 * Sec. 47. AS 29.26.050 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 06 (d) Except as a municipality may require for elections held only in specific 07 local election districts or service areas under (b) of this section, a person who has lived 08 within the municipality for at least 30 days, but who has not registered to vote in state 09 elections at a residence address within the municipality at least 30 days before a 10 municipal election, may vote only an absentee, special needs, or questioned ballot in 11 that election. The municipality may not reject the absentee, special needs, or 12 questioned ballot of a qualified voter who registers within 30 days before or on the day 13 of an election on the grounds that the voter is not on the official registration list for the 14 election. 15 * Sec. 48. AS 39.50.020(b) is amended to read: 16 (b) A public official, [OR] former public official, or candidate for municipal 17 office [OTHER THAN AN ELECTED OR APPOINTED MUNICIPAL OFFICER] 18 shall file the statement with the Alaska Public Offices Commission. Candidates for the 19 office of governor and lieutenant governor and, if the candidate is not subject to 20 AS 24.60, the legislature shall file the statement under AS 15.25.030. The Alaska 21 Public Offices Commission shall provide copies of the statements filed by 22 municipal [MUNICIPAL] officers, former municipal officers, and candidates for 23 elective municipal office to [SHALL FILE WITH] the applicable municipal clerk or 24 other municipal official designated to receive the statements [THEIR FILING FOR 25 OFFICE]. All statements required to be filed under this chapter are public records. 26 * Sec. 49. AS 29.26.050(a)(3) is repealed. 27 * Sec. 50. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 28 read: 29 APPLICABILITY. AS 15.56.030(d), as amended by sec. 41 of this Act, applies to 30 offenses committed on or after the effective date of sec. 41 of this Act. 31 * Sec. 51. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.